Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 2 Tennessee Mineral Surface Mining Law of 1972
59-8-212. Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund — Other available funds. [Contingent amendment. See first version of section and Compiler's Notes.]

All sums received through the payment of fees or the forfeiture of bonds shall be placed in the state treasury and credited to a special agency account to be designated as the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund. This fund, appropriations for which are also authorized, shall be available to the commissioner for expenditure for the reclamation and revegetation of land affected by surface mining operations, including lands so affected prior to enactment of this part; provided, that the proceeds from the forfeiture of any bond shall be used to the extent required in completing reclamation and revegetation of the area with respect to which the bond was posted. The fund shall also be available to the commissioner for expenditures consistent with §59-8-104. Any unencumbered and any unexpended balance of this fund remaining at the end of any fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward for the purpose of reclamation and revegetation of land as provided in this section until expended.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 12; 1974, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., § 58-1551; Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 45; 2018, ch. 839, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which amended this section, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the present third sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-213. Utilizing services of other agencies or persons — Compensation — Funding.

In the reclamation of land affected by surface mining, the commissioner may utilize any services which may be provided by other state or local agencies or by agencies of the federal government, and may compensate them for such service. The commissioner may also receive any federal funds, state funds, or any other funds for the reclamation of land affected by surface mining. The commissioner may cause the reclamation and revegetation work to be done by employees of the commissioner's department or by employees of other governmental agencies or through contracts with qualified persons. Such contracts shall be awarded to the lowest or best bidder upon competitive bids after reasonable advertisement.

Any funds available to the commissioner and any public works program may be used and expended to reclaim any lands that have been subjected to surface mining that have not been reclaimed in accordance with standards set by this part or regulations thereunder and which are not covered by bond to guarantee such reclamation.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 13; T.C.A., § 58-1552.

59-8-214. Right of access.

The designees of the commissioner and any other agency and any contractor under a contract with the commissioner shall have the right of access to the land affected to carry out reclamation.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 13; T.C.A., § 58-1552.

59-8-215. State's power to acquire land affected by surface mining.

This state, acting by and through the department, shall have the power to acquire, either by negotiation or by exercise of the power of eminent domain, land which has been affected or disturbed by surface mining, which now consists of orphan banks or unreclaimed spoil piles, and which in its present state is hazardous or otherwise detrimental to the health and safety of the citizens of the state, or which in its present state is damaging to off-site property or to the water quality of streams.

Prior to acquiring any land pursuant to this section, the commissioner shall extend to the owners thereof an opportunity to reshape, plant and do other acts or reclamation thereon to the same extent and within the same time limits as prescribed in this part and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. If the owner or owners agree in writing to perform such reclamation and, weather permitting, start such reclamation within a period of sixty (60) days, the land shall not be acquired by the state.

The commissioner shall attempt to purchase any land which the commissioner has determined should be acquired for the purpose of reclamation and which the owners have not agreed to reclaim as provided in subsection (b). In any case where the commissioner and the owners of the land are unable to agree upon the amount to be paid for the land, the commissioner may exercise the power of eminent domain against such land by filing a condemnation suit under any procedure as provided in title 29, chapter 16.

The purchase price, in the case of a negotiated acquisition, or the damages as finally determined, in the case of acquisition by condemnation, and the necessary expenses incidental thereto, shall be paid from the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund or appropriations made by the general assembly for such purposes and appropriations for which federal funds made available for such purposes have been credited.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 14; T.C.A., § 58-1553; Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 46.

59-8-216. Commissioner's power to effect reclamation subject to availability of funds.

The commissioner shall have the power to backfill, grade, plant and perform other acts of reclamation or contract for the performance of such reclamation work, on any lands acquired under §59-8-215, to the extent and subject to such conditions as state or federal funds are appropriated and available therefor.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 15; T.C.A., § 58-1554.

59-8-217. Acquisitions and disposals of land after reclamation.

After the reclamation of the acquired land, the commissioner may, with the approval of the governor, transfer jurisdiction of such land, or any portion thereof, to any state agency that can best utilize such land for public purposes. If the retention of such land is determined to be impractical, the commissioner may, with the approval of the governor and attorney general and reporter, sell such land to political subdivisions of this state at the cost of acquisition and reclamation or by public sale to the highest bidder. Such land shall be sold subject to the condition that no surface mining shall be conducted thereon at any time thereafter. The proceeds of any such sale shall be credited to the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund as provided in § 59-8-212.

No land with respect to which a bond conditioned upon the reclamation thereof is in effect shall be acquired pursuant to § 59-8-215, nor shall this part be construed to relieve any person from any obligation to shape, plant or perform other reclamation required by law.

All acquisitions and disposals of land or any interest therein pursuant to the authority granted by this part shall be governed by the applicable provisions of title 12, chapters 1 and 2.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 16; T.C.A., § 58-1555; Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 47.

59-8-218 — 59-8-221. [Reserved.]

Any person or operator who violates any of this part or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or who fails to perform the duties imposed by these provisions or fails or refuses to obtain a permit as provided herein, or who violates any determination or order promulgated pursuant to this part, is liable to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day during which such violation continues, and in addition, may be enjoined from continuing such violation as hereinafter provided. Such penalties shall be recoverable in an action brought in the name of the state of Tennessee by the attorney general in the circuit court of Davidson County or in the circuit court having jurisdiction of the defendant, and all sums recovered shall be placed in the state treasury and credited to the Tennessee surface mining reclamation fund.

It shall be the duty of the district attorneys general in the various circuits throughout the state, or the attorney general, upon the request of the commissioner, to bring an action for the recovery of the penalties herein provided for and to bring an action for a restraining order, temporary or permanent injunction, against any operator or other person violating or threatening to violate any of the provisions of this part or violating or threatening to violate any order or determination promulgated pursuant to this part.

Any person who willfully and knowingly unlawfully falsifies any records, information, plans, specifications, or other data required by the board or the commissioner or who willfully fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any of the provisions of this part is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; provided, that no process by warrant, presentment or indictment shall be issued except upon application of the board or commissioner or such application for process authorized by them.

Nothing in this part shall abrogate the right of any person who is materially or personally damaged or injured by the operation of a surface mine to seek remedies against the responsible person in the courts.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 20; T.C.A., § 58-1560; Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 49; 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-11.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney General, § 4; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 3.

59-8-223. Injunctive relief.

When there is reason to believe that a person is violating or is about to violate or has violated any of the provisions of this part or any permits or orders issued thereunder, the commissioner may institute proceedings in the chancery court of the county in which the alleged violation occurred for injunctive relief to prevent continuance of such action or to correct the conditions resulting or about to result therefrom or both. The court shall grant the injunction without the necessity of showing a lack of adequate remedy at law upon a showing by the commissioner that such person is violating or about to violate or has violated one (1) or more of the provisions of this part. In such suits, the commissioner may obtain permanent or temporary injunctions, prohibitory or mandatory, and restraining orders.

The commissioner may bring suit for injunctive enforcement of any order made by the commissioner when such order has become final as a result of any person's failure to appeal to the board, and such person has failed to comply with the order. In such suits, all findings of fact contained in the order and complaint shall be deemed to be final, and not subject to review except as to receipt of notice of the order, but the defendant may proffer evidence showing that the defendant has in fact complied with the commissioner's order. The order made by the commissioner in such cases shall be prima facie reasonable and valid, and it shall be presumed that the commissioner has complied with all requirements of the law. The board may likewise bring suit for enforcement of any order made by it, which has become final either by the failure of any person to appeal the board's order or by an appellate court's decision against any person who fails to comply with such final order. In such suits, the board's decision shall not be subject to challenge as to matters of law or fact, but the violator may proffer evidence showing that the violator has in fact complied with the board's order.

Any suit for an injunction brought by the commissioner shall be filed in the chancery court of the county in which all or a part of the violation is or is about to occur, in the name of the department, by the district attorney general or by the attorney general at the direction of the commissioner or the board and under the supervision of the attorney general. Such proceedings shall not be tried by jury. Appeals from judgments or decrees of the chancery court in proceedings brought under the provisions of this part shall lie to the supreme court despite the fact that controverted questions of fact may be involved.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 21; 1974, ch. 590, § 10; T.C.A., § 58-1561.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 3.

59-8-224. Supplemental nature of part.

This part shall not operate to repeal or affect any of the laws of the state relating to the pollution of the air or waters thereof, or any conservation or mining laws, but shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 22; T.C.A., § 58-1562.

59-8-225. Immediate conformity to statutes or regulations required.

Irrespective of date of issuance of a permit, all operators shall immediately conform to any statutes enacted or regulations adopted pursuant thereto on the effective date of such statute or regulation. This section shall not require the regrading or replanting of any area on which such work was satisfactorily performed prior to the effective date of the statute or regulation.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 23; T.C.A., § 58-1563.

59-8-226. Sanctions applicable only to mines in violation.

It is the intent of this part, and it is so understood that the commissioner is empowered under all the provisions of this part to suspend or revoke a mining permit or fail to grant a mining permit only to the extent of the one (1) or more mines that, in the opinion of the commissioner, violate or violates the provisions of such sections, and the commissioner is not empowered to shut down, suspend a mining permit, or fail to grant a mining permit on the other mines or prospective mines of the operator that are in compliance with the provisions of this part. In no event is the commissioner empowered to shut down any of the operations of an operator except the actual operation of the mine or mines, that, in the commissioner's opinion, violate the provisions of this part.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 24; T.C.A., § 58-1564.

59-8-227. [Reserved.]

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any exploration for minerals which is conducted solely by drilling or any other method which results in a drill hole of a diameter of six inches (6") or less shall be regulated only under former chapter 9 [repealed] of this title.

Acts 1980, ch. 695, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9 of this title was repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 583.